Massachusetts, session 194th, H479.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any
limited liability company (LLC) business in the commonwealth whose revenues from the prior
fiscal year do not exceed $50,000 shall pay a renewal fee of $100 annually for any such year.
Such LLC businesses shall pay the standard fee required by the office of the secretary of state in
their first year of incorporation.
of 1